Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-292
Township organization; how discontinued.

Any county which has township organization shall discontinue the same whenever the majority of the registered voters of the county voting on the question of such discontinuance so decide in the manner provided in sections 23-293 to 23-295.

Laws 1885, c. 43, § 1, p. 235;

R.S.1913, § 1056;

C.S.1922, § 958;

C.S.1929, § 26-272;

R.S.1943, § 23-292;

Laws 2008, LB269, § 5.